Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-6101
Act, how cited.

Sections 71-6101 to 71-6108 shall be known and may be cited as the Interior Design Voluntary Registration Act.

Laws 2024, LB16, § 14.